Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 9 Public Works
22-9-203. Public improvements generally — Award procedure.

(a)

Except as provided under §14-58-105, a contract providing for the making of major repairs or alterations, for the erection of buildings or other structures, or for making other permanent improvements shall not be entered into by the state or an agency of the state or by a county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit with any contractor in instances in which all estimated costs of the work exceed the sum of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) unless:

(1)

The state or any agency of the state shall have first published notice of its intention to receive bids one (1) time each week for not less than two (2) consecutive weeks for projects more than the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and published notice of its intention to receive bids one (1) time each week for not less than one (1) week for projects more than the quote bid limit, as provided under the minimum standards and criteria of the Building Authority Division, but less than or equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the proposed improvements are to be made or in a trade journal reaching the construction industry; and

(2)(A)

The county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit shall have first published notice of its intention to receive bids one (1) time each week for not less than two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the proposed improvements are to be made.

(B)

In addition to the publication of notice required under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section, the county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit:

(i)

May also publish notice in a trade journal reaching the construction industry; and

(ii)

If the county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit is accepting electronically submitted bids, shall also post notice on the website of a vendor selected under the Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act, §22-9-901 et seq.

(b)(1)

The date of publication of the last notice shall be not less than one (1) week before the day fixed therein for the receipt of bids.

(2)(A)

If there is not a newspaper regularly published in the county in which the proposed work is to be done, the notices may be published in any newspaper having a general circulation in the county.

(B)

In addition to the publication of notice required under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, the county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit:

(i)

May also publish notice in a trade journal reaching the construction industry; and

(ii)

If the county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit is accepting electronically submitted bids, shall also post notice on the website of a vendor selected under the Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act, §22-9-901 et seq.

(3)

This section does not limit to two (2) the number of weeks the notices may be published for projects over fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), limit to one (1) the number of weeks the notices may be published for projects more than the quote bid limit, as provided under subsection (a) of this section, and less than or equal to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or limit to two (2) the number of weeks the notices may be published for all other projects.

(c)(1)

All notices shall contain:

(A)

A brief description of the kind or type of work contemplated;

(B)

The approximate location of the work contemplated;

(C)

The place at which prospective bidders may obtain plans and specifications, including any websites on which a county, municipality, or school district is posting notice of its intention to receive bids under the Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act, §22-9-901 et seq.;

(D)

The date, time, and place at which sealed bids shall be received;

(E)

The amount, which may be stated in a percentage, of the bid bond required;

(F)

A statement of the taxing unit's reservation of the right to reject any or all bids and to waive any formalities; and

(G)

Such other pertinent facts or information which to it may appear necessary or desirable.

(2)(A)(i)

Every bid submitted on public construction contracts for any political subdivision of the state is void unless accompanied by a cashier's check drawn upon a bank or trust company doing business in this state or by a corporate bid bond.

(ii)

Every bid submitted on public construction contracts for the state or any agency or department of the state is void unless accompanied by a cashier's check drawn upon a bank or trust company doing business in this state or by a corporate bid bond, except for projects under thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(iii)

A bid bond is not required for public construction contracts for the state or any agency or department of the state under or equal to thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(B)

This bid security shall indemnify the public against failure of the contractor to execute and deliver the contract and necessary bonds for faithful performance of the contract.

(C)

The bid security shall provide that the contractor or surety must pay the damage, loss, cost, and expense subject to the amount of the bid security directly arising out of the contractor's default in failing to execute and deliver the contract and bonds.

(D)

Liability under this bid security shall be limited to five percent (5%) of the amount of the bid.

(d)

On the date and time fixed in the notice, the board, commission, officer, or other authority in which or in whom authority is vested to award contracts shall open and compare the bids and thereafter award the contract to the lowest responsible bidder but only if it is the opinion of the authority that the best interests of the taxing unit would be served thereby.

(e)

In the event that all bids submitted exceed the amount appropriated for the award of the contract, the state agency or its designated representatives shall have the authority to negotiate an award with the apparent responsible low bidder but only if the low bid is within twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount appropriated.

(f)(1)

In the event that all bids submitted exceed the amount appropriated for the award of the contract and if bidding on alternates was not required by the plans and specifications, the county, municipality, school district, other local taxing unit, or institution of higher education shall have the authority to negotiate an award with the apparent responsible low bidder but only if the low bid is within twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount appropriated.

(2)

If the plans and specifications for the project require bids on alternates in addition to a base bid, there shall be no more than three (3) alternates, and the alternates shall:

(A)

Be deductive; and

(B)

Be set forth in the plans and specifications in numerical order.

(3)

If all bids submitted exceed the amount appropriated for the award of the contract, then the county, municipality, school district, other local taxing unit, or institution of higher education may determine the apparent responsible low bidder by deducting the alternates in numerical order.

(4)

After making the deductions, if the cost of the project is less than twenty-five percent (25%) above the amount appropriated, then and only in that event, the county, municipality, school district, other local taxing unit, or institution of higher education may negotiate an award with the low bidder so determined.

(g)

Whenever it is obvious from examination of the bid document that it was the intent of a bidder to submit a responsive bid and that the bid, if accepted, would create a serious financial loss to the bidder because of scrivener error, such as the transposition of figures, the board, commission, officer, or other authority in which or in whom authority is vested has the authority to relieve the bidder from responsibility under the bond and may reject the bid.

(h)

For projects of this state or any agency of the state, “amount appropriated” within this section means funds currently available for the project as determined by the state or any agency or department of the state or any county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit prior to the opening of any bids.

(i)

No contract providing for the making of major repairs or alterations, for the erection of buildings or other structures, or for making other permanent improvements shall be entered into by the state, any agency of the state, any county, municipality, school district, or other local taxing unit with any contractor in instances where all estimated costs of the work shall exceed the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) unless the bid documents contain statements which encourage the participation of small, minority, and women's business enterprises.

(j)(1)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a municipality, sanitation authority, water system, or consolidated waterworks system may enter into contracts with private persons, firms, associations, corporations, joint ventures, or other legal entities, including a combination of any of those entities, to provide for the design, building, operation, or maintenance, including a combination of those activities, of all or any portion of its wastewater system, stormwater system, water system, solar energy generation equipment and facilities, other capital asset, or any combination of those systems and assets.

(2)

The contracts may include provisions for design, financing, construction, repair, reconditioning, replacement, operation, and maintenance of a system or asset, or any combination of those services and functions.

(3)

Prior to entering into a contract under this section, the governing authority shall solicit qualifications-based competitive sealed proposals.

(4)

The governing authority shall first establish criteria for evaluation of any entity submitting proposals on the contracts for the purpose of assisting the governing authority in making a review of the entity's previous performance on projects of comparable nature and magnitude and the environmental compliance record of the entity during the five (5) years immediately preceding the execution of the contract.

(5)

The governing authority shall take into consideration the information to assist in determining the eligibility of any entity.

(6)

The award of a contract under this section shall be made to the responsible and responsive entity whose proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the governmental authority, taking into consideration the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals.

(7)

The governing authority of the municipality or the sanitation authority shall employ an appropriately licensed professional who is independent of the contractor to monitor and perform an independent review and inspection of the design-build-operate-maintenance contract, or any part thereof, during its performance.

(8)

Before soliciting proposals for a design-build-operation-maintenance project, the governing authority of the municipality or the sanitation authority shall employ an appropriate licensed professional to perform the necessary studies and preliminary design to clearly establish the parameters for the project, including:

(A)

Acceptable processes and structural alternatives; and

(B)

Cost estimates for the acceptable alternatives.

(k)(1)

The state, an agency of the state, a county, a municipality, a school district, or other local taxing unit shall not require in plans or specifications that a bidder or supplier:

(A)

Hold membership in any professional or industry associations, societies, trade groups, or similar organizations;

(B)

Possess certification from any professional or industry associations, societies, trade groups, or similar organizations as steel building fabricators; or

(C)

Be endorsed by any professional or industry associations, societies, trade groups, or similar organizations.

(2)

However, plans and specifications may include or reference standards adopted by professional or industry associations, societies, trade groups, or similar organizations.

(l)

To the extent that the division includes minimum experience as part of the evaluation of a bidder's responsiveness, the standard being applied to the bidder's experience shall be stated in the invitation for bids.

(m)

A sealed bid under this section shall be submitted in one (1) of the following formats:

(1)

Written; or

(2)

Electronic media.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 159, §§ 1, 2; 1977, No. 370, § 1; 1981, No. 266, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-611, 14-612; Acts 1987, No. 758, § 4; 1995, No. 1319, § 2; 1997, No. 1193, § 1; 1999, No. 219, § 3; 1999, No. 675, §§ 1, 2; 1999, No. 1309, § 1; 1999, No. 1310, § 1; 2001, No. 921, § 1; 2001, No. 1051, § 1; 2003, No. 1297, § 1; 2005, No. 859, § 4; 2009, No. 813, § 1; 2015, No. 1059, § 2; 2017, No. 725, §§ 3, 4; 2019, No. 422, § 3; 2019, No. 612, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6238; 2019, No. 1075, §§ 3-6.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

There is a need for a statewide system for the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units;

“(2)

Legislation is necessary to provide for the efficient procurement of services to provide for the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units;

“(3)

There is a need for an impartial selection process in selecting statewide vendors to administer online advertisements of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units; and

“(4)

The Office of State Procurement has the authority and infrastructure to issue requests for qualifications to effectuate this act”.

Publisher's Notes.

As to applicability of this section to certain contracts awarded by the State Highway Commission, see Publisher's Notes to §22-9-202.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment by No. 219 substituted “cashier's check drawn upon a bank or trust company doing business in this state” for “certified check” twice in (c)(2)(A). This amendment was superseded by the amendment by Acts 1999, No. 1309.

The 1999 amendment by No. 675 substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” for “thirty thousand dollars ($30,000)” in the introductory paragraph of (a); deleted the former last sentence of (a)(2); in the introductory paragraph of (e), deleted “and if bidding on alternates was not required by the plans and specifications” and substituted “twenty-five percent (25%)” for “twenty percent (20%)”; deleted former (f); redesignated former (g) and (h) as present (f) and (g), respectively; in (g) substituted “of the state” for “thereof” and “opening” for “solicitation”; and made stylistic changes.

The 1999 amendment by No. 1309 rewrote (c)(2)(A).

The 1999 amendment by No. 1310 added (h).

The 2001 amendment by No. 921 inserted (f) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in present (g), inserted “that” preceding the second occurrence of “the bid”, inserted a comma following “error”, inserted “the” preceding “transposition”, and twice substituted “the” for “his”; and deleted a comma following “repairs” in (i).

The 2001 amendment by No. 1051 substituted “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)” for “ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for counties and municipalities and the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for any school district” in the introductory language in (a); and, in (a)(1), substituted “more than the amount” for “over the amount” and “under the Arkansas Building Services minimum standards and criteria” for “under subsection (a) of this section.”

The 2003 amendment added (j).

The 2005 amendment added (k).

The 2009 amendment inserted “or institution of higher education” following “local taxing unit” throughout (f), and made related changes.

The 2015 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Except as provided under §14-58-105, a” for “No,” “shall not be” for “shall be” and “an agency of the state or by a” for “any agency thereof, any”.

The 2017 amendment substituted “thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)” in the introductory language of (a), (c)(2)(A)(ii) and (c)(2)(A)(iii); deleted “shall” following “work” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “is” for “shall be” in (c)(2)(A)(i) and (c)(2)(A)(ii); and substituted “A bid bond is not” for “No bid bond shall be” in (c)(2)(A)(iii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 422 added (l).

The 2019 amendment by No. 612, in (j)(1), deleted “or” following “municipality”, inserted “water system, or consolidated waterworks system”, substituted “or maintenance” for “and maintenance”, inserted “including a combination of those activities”, deleted “treatment” preceding the third through fifth occurrences of “system”, inserted “solar energy generation equipment and facilities, other capital asset”, and added “and assets”; in (j)(2), substituted “a system or asset” for “the system”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1075 rewrote (b)(2); in (b)(3), substituted “This section does not limit” for “Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting”, deleted “the amount of” following “over”, substituted the second occurrence of “limit” for “limiting”, and substituted “or limit” for “and as limiting”; substituted “of the work contemplated” for “thereof” in (c)(1)(B); added “including any websites on which a county, municipality, or school district is posting notice of its intention to receive bids under the Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act, §22-9-901 et seq.” in (c)(1)(C); and added (l) [now (m)].

Cross References.

Local Governmental Compliance Act, §10-4-301 et seq.

22-9-204. Subcontractors exceeding $50,000 — Penalty.

(a)

As a condition to performing construction work for and in the State of Arkansas, all prime contractors shall use no other subcontractors when the subcontractors' portion of the project is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more, except those licensed by the Contractors Licensing Board and qualified in:

(1)

Mechanical, indicative of heating, air conditioning, ventilation, and refrigeration;

(2)

Plumbing;

(3)

Electrical; and

(4)

Roofing.

(b)(1)

In the event the prime contractor is qualified and licensed by the board, he or she may use his or her own forces to perform those tasks listed in this section as subcontractors in one (1) or more of the trades listed.

(2)(A)

A subcontractor, including the situation stated in subdivision (b)(1) of this section, may subcontract a portion of the listed work.

(B)

However, a subcontractor is prohibited from subcontracting the work in its entirety.

(c)(1)

When the prime contractor makes a definite decision regarding the subcontractors he or she intends to use, he or she shall place the name of each subcontractor in a blank space provided on the form of proposal of his or her bid.

(2)

In the event that one (1) or more of the subcontractors named by the prime contractor in his or her successful bid thereafter refuses to perform his or her contract or offered contract, the prime contractor may substitute another subcontractor licensed by the board after having obtained prior approval from the architect or engineer and the owner. Additional approval must be obtained from the Building Authority Division for capital improvement projects under its jurisdiction.

(d)

The prime contractor shall submit written evidence that the substituted contractor is costing the same amount of money or less and, if costing less, that the savings will be deducted from the total contract of the prime contractor and rebated to the owner.

(e)

It shall be mandatory that the mechanical, plumbing, electrical, and roofing subcontractors named on the form of proposal by the prime contractor awarded a contract under the provisions of this subchapter be given contracts by the prime contractor in keeping with their proposals to perform the items for which they were named.

(f)(1)

It shall be a violation of this section for any prime contractor to submit a bid listing unlicensed contractors or to use unlicensed contractors on a public works project if the listed work of the unlicensed contractors or portion of the unlicensed contractors' work is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more.

(2)

It shall be a violation of this section for any subcontractor who is not licensed by the board to contract to perform work on a public works project if the listed work of the subcontractor or portion of the subcontractor's work is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more.

(3)

The board has jurisdiction over violations of this subsection under §17-25-103.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 159, § 3; 1957, No. 183, § 1; 1961, No. 477, § 1; 1983, No. 871, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-613; Acts 1987, No. 759, § 1; 1989, No. 936, § 1; 1991, No. 728, § 1; 1993, No. 645, § 1; 1999, No. 1250, § 1; 1999, No. 1496, § 1; 2001, No. 989, § 1; 2003, No. 364, § 18; 2009, No. 193, § 9; 2011, No. 782, § 2; 2015, No. 1048, §
7; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 55; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 55; 2019, No. 910, § 6239.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Publisher's Notes.

As to applicability of this section to certain contracts awarded by the State Highway Commission, see Publisher's Notes to §22-9-202.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 55 specifically amended this section as amended by Acts 2015, No. 1048, § 7.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment by No. 1250 added (b)(2); and, in (c)(2), deleted “and the Construction Section of Arkansas State Building Services” following “the owner” and added the last sentence.

The 1999 amendment by No. 1496, in the introductory paragraph of (a), substituted “All” for “In each instance where the total bid amount submitted by the licensed prime contractor exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), all” at the beginning, and inserted “when the subcontractors' portion of the project is twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment substituted “ventilation, and refrigeration” for “and ventilating” (a)(1); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2003 amendment deleted “indicative of wiring and illuminating fixtures” following “Electrical” in (a)(3); and deleted “and sheet metal work, indicative of roofing application” following “Roofing” in (a)(4).

The 2009 amendment rewrote (f)(3); and deleted (f)(4) and (f)(5).

The 2011 amendment deleted “and sheet metal contractors” following “roofing” in (e); added “if the listed work of the unlicensed contractors ... ($20,000) or more” in (f)(1); and added “if the listed work of the subcontractor ... ($20,000) or more” in (f)(2).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1048 substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)” throughout the section; and substituted “$50,000” for “$20,000” in the section heading.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in the last sentence of (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (c)(2).

22-9-205. Public improvements generally — Interest on delinquent payments.

Whenever any agency of this state or of any county, municipality, or school district, or other local taxing unit or improvement district enters into a contract covered by the provisions of §§22-9-202 —22-9-204 for the making of repairs or alterations or the erection of buildings or for the making of any other improvements, or for the construction or improvement of highways, roads, streets, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, drainage or sewer projects, or for any other construction project, and the contract provides that payment therefor shall be made upon completion and acceptance of the project, and the contractor, upon completion and approval of the project, presents a claim for payment of the amount due thereon in accordance with the terms of the contract, and the claim is not paid by the public authority within ninety (90) days from the date of presentation of the claim, then the public authority shall pay to the contractor interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum on the unpaid amount due for all periods of time that the payment under the contract is not made subsequent to ninety (90) days after presentation of the claim.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 135, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-614.1.

22-9-206. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning preference for certain bidders on highway projects, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 580, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 102, §§ 1-3, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-614.2 — 14-614.4, 14-614.6; Acts 1987, No. 281, § 1; 1991, No. 779, § 1; 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 9, § 1.

22-9-207. Construction or purchase of memorial, statue, bust, etc.

Any state agency, department, board, commission, or other body having the authority to construct or purchase, or negotiate for the construction or purchase of, any memorial, statue, bust, monument, or other similar article which is to be paid for from public funds shall establish specifications for the object, take competitive bids on the cost of constructing or furnishing the object, and award the contract to furnish or construct the object to the lowest responsible bidder meeting the established specifications.

History.

Acts 1967, No. 354, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-626.

22-9-208. Renovation of historic sites — Legislative intent and construction.

(a)

The General Assembly finds and determines that:

(1)

The mandatory adherence to competitive bidding of all costs in altering, repairing, or renovating historic sites and structures has resulted in increased costs due to the inability of bidders to accurately determine on the basis of only an external examination of the historic sites and structures the exact quantity of labor, materials, and supplies necessary to meet the restoration standards;

(2)

The State of Arkansas would conserve state revenues by giving agencies charged with restoring or maintaining historic properties authority to select the contractors on the basis of the lowest responsible bid price, the bidder's experience in like work, and the techniques he or she proposes to employ, and by giving the agencies authority to reimburse contractors on an actual cost basis for those cost components which cannot be accurately predetermined before undertaking the project; and

(3)

The procedures provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section should be applicable for specific projects only after review and approval by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Building Authority Division, the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services, and the Legislative Council. Provided, however, projects undertaken by public institutions of higher education exempt from review and approval of the division shall not require review and approval by the secretary.

(b)

In the event there is conflict between the provisions of this section and §§22-9-209 —22-9-211 and the provisions of any other act insofar as the restoration of historic structures is concerned, the procedures set forth in this section and §§22-9-209 —22-9-211 shall govern.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 869, §§ 1, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 14-654, 14-654.3n; Acts 1999, No. 776, § 4; 2001, No. 961, § 10; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 56; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 56; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 81; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 81; 2019, No. 910, § 6240.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:

“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added the last sentence in (a)(3); and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment, in (a)(3), added the last sentence, and deleted “The state or entities of the state shall make an assessment regarding the applicability of those procedures provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section on a project by project basis” at the end.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, in (a)(3), deleted “Arkansas” preceding “Building Authority” throughout the subdivision; and inserted “Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” and “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration or the”.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3, in (a)(3),
substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Building Authority Council” in the first sentence and in the second sentence substituted “division” for “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” and deleted “or the Building Authority Council” from the end.

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(3), deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”, inserted “the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services”, and substituted “secretary” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration”.

22-9-209. Renovation of historic sites — Advertising of contracts.

(a)(1)

A contract for the altering, repairing, or renovation of a recognized historic site or structure owned by the state or with title vested in the name of a state agency or of another taxing authority in which the estimated cost of the work equals or exceeds the sum of thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) shall not be entered into between the state agency or taxing authority and any contractor unless the state agency or taxing authority has first published notice of intention to receive bids for improvements one (1) time each week for not less than two (2) consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the proposed improvements are to be made.

(2)

In addition to the publication of notice required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the state agency or taxing authority:

(A)

May also publish notice in a trade journal reaching the construction industry; and

(B)

If the state agency or taxing authority is accepting electronically submitted bids, shall also post notice on the website of a vendor selected under the Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act, §22-9-901 et seq.

(b)(1)

The date of publication of the last notice shall be not less than one (1) week before the date affixed therein for the receipt of bids.

(2)(A)

If there is not a newspaper regularly published in the county in which the proposed work is to be done, the notices may be published in any newspaper having a general circulation in the county.

(B)

In addition to the publication of notice required under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, the state agency or taxing authority:

(i)

May also publish notice in a trade journal reaching the construction industry; and

(ii)

If the state agency or taxing authority is accepting electronically submitted bids, shall also post notice on the website of a vendor selected under the Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act, §22-9-901 et seq.

(3)

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting to two (2) the number of weeks the notices may be published.

(c)(1)

All notices shall contain:

(A)

A brief description of the kind or type of work contemplated;

(B)

The approximate location of the work contemplated;

(C)

The place at which prospective contractors may obtain plans and specifications, including any websites on which a state agency or taxing authority is posting notice of its intention to receive bids under the Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act, §22-9-901 et seq.;

(D)

The date, time, and place at which sealed bids shall be received; and

(E)

The amount, which may be stated in a percentage, of bond required.

(2)

A statement shall be included notifying bidders that the proposed renovation will be contracted under the authority of this section and §§22-9-208,22-9-210, and22-9-211.

(3)

The invitation for bids shall include a required resumé of similar restorative work performed by the contractor.

(d)(1)

No agency shall advertise for bids under the provisions of this section and §§22-9-208,22-9-210, and22-9-211 without seeking the advice of the Legislative Council.

(2)

Provided further, nothing in this section shall prevent an institution of higher education exempt from review and approval of the Building Authority Division from entering into an agreement with the division to provide such advice.

(e)

A sealed bid under this section shall be submitted in one (1) of the following formats:

(1)

Written; or

(2)

Electronic media.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 869, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-654.1; Acts 2001, No. 961, § 11; 2013, No. 494, § 2; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 82; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 82; 2017, No. 725, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 6241; 2019, No. 1075, §§ 7-10.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided:
“Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

There is a need for a statewide system for the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units;

“(2)

Legislation is necessary to provide for the efficient procurement of services to provide for the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units;

“(3)

There is a need for an impartial selection process in selecting statewide vendors to administer online advertisements of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units; and

“(4)

The Office of State Procurement has the authority and infrastructure to issue requests for qualifications to effectuate this act”.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment redesignated former (d) as present (d)(1) and made related changes; and added (d)(2)(A)-(B).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “and the Building Authority Council” from the end of (d)(1); and deleted (d)(2)(A).

The 2017 amendment, in (a), substituted “state” for “State of Arkansas” following “owned by the” and substituted “thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 1075 rewrote (a); added (b)(2)(B) and redesignated former (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A); substituted “not a” for “no” in (b)(2)(A); rewrote (c)(1); and added (e).